Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201719-5316
Records; meetings; reports.

(1) The authority shall cause minutes and a record to be kept of all its proceedings. Meetings of the authority shall be subject to the Open Meetings Act.

(2) All of an authority’s records and documents shall be considered public records for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.

(3) The authority shall provide quarterly reports to the city that created the authority on the authority’s activities pursuant to the Riverfront Development District Act. The authority shall also provide an annual report to the city that created the authority and to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature by January 31 of each year summarizing the authority’s activities for the prior calendar year. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 2017, LB97, § 16.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.